New Jersey, session 222, A3086.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: "Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number" or "CASRN" means a numeric identifier assigned to a chemical by the Chemical Abstracts Service, a division of the American Chemical Society. Paraquat dichloride means the organic compound commonly used as an herbicide and desiccant, also known as methyl viologen (CASRN 1910-42-5). b.  No later than two years after the effective date of this act, the Department of Environmental Protection shall, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations to prohibit all consumer and commercial uses of paraquat dichloride and require owners and operators of facilities that utilize paraquat dichloride to appropriate measures to protect the facilities workers from exposure to paraquat dichloride. c.  Any uses of paraquat dichloride that are preempted under the federal "Toxic Substances Control Act," (15 U.S.C. s.2601 et seq.), shall be exempt from the provisions of this section. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.